Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.570

Private business activity policy—Department of fish and wildlife—Parks and recreation commission.

(1) The department of fish and wildlife and the parks and recreation commission may approve private business activity in state-owned housing provided under Title 77 RCW or chapter 79A.05 RCW.

(2) Prior to granting approval of private business activity in state-owned housing, the department of fish and wildlife and the parks and recreation commission must adopt a private business activity policy that is approved by the executive ethics board.

(a) The private business activity policy may only authorize private business activity by the resident state employee while the employee is off duty or the employee's spouse who is approved for residency in the agency housing or the employee's children.

(b) The private business activity policy may not allow private business activity that negatively impacts the agency's operations. For the purposes of this section, "negatively impacts" includes but is not limited to: (i) Negative impacts to visitors' services or access; (ii) in-person visits to state-owned housing for the purpose of transacting business that negatively impacts agency operations; (iii) the incurrence of additional expenses by the state; (iv) the use of signage in the state-owned residence; (v) advertising on state-owned property; or (vi) an appearance of state endorsement of the private business activity.

(3) The private business activity must comply with all other local, state, and federal laws.

(4) All approvals of a private business activity in state-owned housing must be by the agency director or designee in writing.

(5) A state employee is presumed not to be in violation of RCW 42.52.070 or 42.52.160 if the employee or the employee's spouse or child complies with this section.

[ 2008 c 247 s 1.]